Utah statutes.
58-44a-301.   Licensure required -- License classification.
(1)  A license is required to engage in practice as a certified nurse midwife,
except as provided in Section 58-1-307.
(2)  The division shall issue to individuals qualified under the provisions of
this chapter a license in the classification certified nurse midwife.
(3)  An individual holding a certified nurse midwife license as of July 1,
1998, who cannot document the successful completion of advanced course work
approved by the division in collaboration with the board in patient
assessment, diagnosis and treatment, and pharmacotherapeutics, may not
prescribe and shall be issued a "CNM without prescriptive practice" license.
(4)  The division shall grant a certified nurse midwife license to any
licensed certified nurse midwife currently holding prescriptive authority
under any predecessor act on July 1, 1998.
